Nebraska, session 109, LB955.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 38-2867.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-2867.03 (1) A pharmacist may enter into a practice agreement as
provided in this section with (a) a licensed health care practitioner
authorized to prescribe independently or (b) a physician assistant under a
collaborative agreement pursuant to section 38-2055 to provide pharmaceutical
care according to written protocols. The pharmacist shall notify the board of
any practice agreement at the initiation of the agreement and at the time of
any change in parties to the agreement or written protocols. The notice shall
be given to both the Board of Pharmacy and the board which licensed the health
care practitioner. The notice shall contain the name of each pharmacist
participating in the practice agreement and each licensed health care
practitioner authorized to prescribe independently or each physician assistant
under a collaborative agreement participating in the practice agreement and a
description of the therapy being monitored or initiated.
(2) A copy of the practice agreement and written protocols shall be
available for review by a representative of the department. A copy of the
practice agreement shall be sent to the Board of Pharmacy upon request by the
board.
(3) A practice agreement shall be in writing. Each party pharmacist
participating in the agreement and each licensed health care practitioner
authorized to prescribe independently participating in the agreement shall sign
the agreement and the written protocols at the initiation of the agreement and
shall review, sign, and date the documents every two years thereafter. If a
physician assistant is prescribing under a collaborative agreement, the
supervising physician shall also sign the practice agreement. A practice
agreement is active after it is signed by all the parties listed in the
agreement.
(4) A practice agreement and written protocols cease immediately upon (a)
the death of either the pharmacist or the practitioner, (b) the loss of license
to practice by either the pharmacist or the practitioner, (c) a disciplinary
action limiting the ability of either the pharmacist or practitioner to enter
into practice agreement, or (d) the individual decision of either the
pharmacist or practitioner or mutual agreement by the parties to terminate the
agreement.
(5) A pharmacist intern may participate in a practice agreement without
expressly being mentioned in the agreement if the pharmacist intern is
supervised by a pharmacist who is a party to the agreement.
Sec. 2. Original section 38-2867.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-1-